Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.010

Bylaws.

(1) A state trust company shall adopt bylaws and may amend its bylaws from time to time for the purposes and in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Washington business corporation act.

(2) A limited liability trust company in which management is retained by the participants is not required to adopt bylaws if provisions required by law to be contained in the bylaws are contained in the articles of association or the participation agreement. If a limited liability trust company has adopted bylaws which designate each full liability participant, the limited liability trust company shall file with the director a copy of the bylaws. Solely that portion of the bylaws designating each full liability participant is a public record.

[ 2014 c 37 s 347.]